Washington statutes.
RCW 16.67.030

Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter:

(1) "Commission" means the Washington state beef commission.

(2) "Director" means the director of agriculture of the state of Washington or an appointed representative.

(3) "Ex officio members" means those advisory members of the commission who do not have a vote.

(4) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state of Washington.

(5) "Person" includes any individual, firm, corporation, trust, association, partnership, society, or any other organization of individuals.

(6) "Beef producer" means any person who raises, breeds, grows, or purchases cattle or calves for beef production.

(7) "Dairy (beef) producer" means any person who raises, breeds, grows, or purchases cattle for dairy production and who is actively engaged in the production of fluid milk.

(8) "Feeder" means any person actively engaged in the business of feeding cattle and usually operating a feed lot.

(9) "Producer" means any person actively engaged in the cattle industry including beef producers and dairy (beef) producers.

(10) "Washington cattle" shall mean all cattle owned or controlled by affected producers and located or sold in the state of Washington.

(11) "Meat packer" means any person operating a slaughtering establishment subject to inspection under a federal meat inspection act.

(12) "Livestock salesyard operator" means any person licensed to operate a cattle auction market or salesyard under the provisions of chapter 16.65 RCW as enacted or hereafter amended.

(13) "Mail" or "send" for purposes of any notice relating to rule making means regular mail or electronic distribution, as provided in RCW 34.05.260 for rule making. "Electronic distribution" or "electronically" means distribution by electronic mail or facsimile mail.

[ 2002 c 313 s 80; 1999 c 291 s 30; 1969 c 133 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.